Illinois, session 104th, SB1380.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1192 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)7    Sec. 5-1192. County use of utility pole for county public 8safety. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Communications space" has the meaning given to that term 11in the National Electric Safety Code as published by the 12Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.13    "Communication worker safety zone" has the meaning given 14to that term in the National Electric Safety Code as published 15by the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.16    "Electric supply zone" has the meaning given to that term 17in the National Electric Safety Code as published by the 18Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.19    "Public utility" has the meaning given to that term in 20Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.21    (b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c), a county 22may use a utility pole that is owned by the State or a unit of 23local government or a public right-of-way that is owned by the   SB1380 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08050 RTM 18096 b1State or a unit of local government for county public safety 2purposes, including, but not limited to, the placement of 3equipment associated with public safety. The equipment may not 4be located within or interfere with part of an electric 5distribution or transmission system within the communication 6worker safety zone of the pole or the electric supply zone of 7the pole. The use of the equipment must comply with the 8applicable codes and local code provisions or regulations that 9concern public safety.10    (c) A State agency may, by rule, or a unit of local 11government may, by ordinance or resolution, create a 12permitting process to allow a utility pole or a public 13right-of-way that it owns to be used by a county for public 14safety purposes.15    (d) Any fee charged by the owner of a utility pole or 16right-of-way for use by a county under this Section shall be at 17the lowest rate charged by the owner and shall not exceed the 18owner's costs.19    (e) Nothing in this Section authorizes a county to use 20property or infrastructure that is owned by a public utility. 21    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22adding Section 11-80-25 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/11-80-25 new)24    Sec. 11-80-25. Municipal use of utility pole for municipal   SB1380 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08050 RTM 18096 b1public safety. 2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Communications space" has the meaning given to that term 4in the National Electric Safety Code as published by the 5Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.6    "Communication worker safety zone" has the meaning given 7to that term in the National Electric Safety Code as published 8by the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.9    "Electric supply zone" has the meaning given to that term 10in the National Electric Safety Code as published by the 11Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.12    "Public utility" has the meaning given to that term in 13Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.14    (b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c), a 15municipality may use a utility pole that is owned by the State 16or a unit of local government or a public right-of-way that is 17owned by the State or a unit of local government for municipal 18public safety purposes, including, but not limited to, the 19placement of equipment associated with public safety. The 20equipment may not be located within or interfere with part of 21an electric distribution or transmission system within the 22communication worker safety zone of the pole or the electric 23supply zone of the pole. The use of the equipment must comply 24with the applicable codes and local code provisions or 25regulations that concern public safety.26    (c) A State agency may, by rule, or a unit of local   SB1380 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08050 RTM 18096 b1government may, by ordinance or resolution, create a 2permitting process to allow a utility pole or a public 3right-of-way that it owns to be used by a municipality for 4public safety purposes.5    (d) Any fee charged by the owner of a utility pole or 6right-of-way for use by a municipality under this Section 7shall be at the lowest rate charged by the owner and shall not 8exceed the owner's costs.9    (e) Nothing in this Section authorizes a municipality to 10use property or infrastructure that is owned by a public 11utility.